California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) The department has obtained any necessary federal approvals.

(3) The Medi-Cal managed care plan has established a local stakeholder process with the meaningful engagement of a diverse group of families that represent a range of conditions, disabilities, and demographics, and local providers, including, but not limited to, the parent centers, such as family resource centers, family empowerment centers, and parent training and information centers, that support
 families in the affected county.

(4) The director has verified the readiness of the managed care plan to address the unique needs of CCS-eligible beneficiaries, including, but not limited to, the requirements set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14087.48, subdivisions (b) to (f), inclusive, of Section 14093.05, and all of the following:

(A) That the managed care contractor has demonstrated the availability of an appropriate provider network to serve the needs of children and youth with CCS conditions, including primary care physicians, pediatric specialists and subspecialists, professional, allied, and medical supportive personnel, licensed acute care hospitals, and special care centers.

(B) That the Medi-Cal managed care plan has established and maintains an updated and accessible listing of providers and their
 specialties and subspecialties and makes it available to CCS-eligible children and youth and their parents or guardians, at a minimum by telephone, written material, and
 internet website.

(C) That the Medi-Cal managed care plan has entered into an agreement with the county CCS program or the state, or both, for the transition of CCS care coordination and service authorization and how the plan will work with the CCS program to ensure continuity and consistency of CCS program expertise for that role, in accordance with this section.

(e) A Medi-Cal managed care plan, prior to implementation of the Whole Child Model program, shall review historical CCS fee-for-service utilization data for CCS-eligible children and youth upon transition of CCS services to managed care plans so that the managed care plans are better able to assist CCS-eligible children and youth and prioritize assessment and care planning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 129.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.9.

(a) The department shall develop a memorandum of understanding template, which shall be utilized by participating counties and health plans, and which shall include, but not be limited to, the standards relating to the local administration of, and minimum services to be provided by, counties and Medi-Cal managed care plans in the administration of the Whole Child Model program. The department shall consult with counties and Medi-Cal managed care plans in the development of the Whole Child Model program memorandum of understanding template.

(b) The department shall provide written notice to the county agency, as designated in Section 123850 of the Health and Safety Code, of the calculation for
 determining the administrative allocation to the county CCS program by means of county information notice. The department shall consult with the Whole Child Model program counties in determining the calculation for determining the administrative allocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 625, Sec. 7.   (SB 586)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.10.

(a) Each Medi-Cal managed care plan participating in the Whole Child Model program shall establish an assessment process that, at a minimum, does all of the following:

(1) Assesses each CCS child’s or youth’s risk level and needs by performing a risk assessment process using means such as telephonic or in-person communication, review of utilization and claims processing data, or by other means as determined by the department.

(2) Assesses, in accordance with the transition agreement with the county CCS program, the health care needs of CCS-eligible children and youth and coordinates their CCS specialty services, Medi-Cal primary care
 services and mild to moderate mental health services, specialty mental health as appropriate through the county specialty mental health plan, and Drug Medi-Cal services as appropriate through county substance use disorder program, and regional center services across all settings, including coordination of necessary services within and, when necessary, outside of the managed care plan’s provider network.

(3) Follows timeframes for reassessment of risk and, if necessary, circumstances or conditions that require redetermination of risk level, which shall be set by the department.

(b) The risk assessment process shall be performed in accordance with all applicable federal and state laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 625, Sec. 7.   (SB 586)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.11.

A Medi-Cal managed care plan participating in the Whole Child Model program shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) Ensure that each CCS-eligible child or youth receives case management, care coordination, provider referral, and service authorization services from an employee or contractor of the plan who has knowledge of, and receives adequate training on, the CCS program, and who has clinical experience with the CCS population, or clinical experience with pediatric patients with complex medical conditions. In addition, the plan shall ensure that a CCS-eligible child has a primary point of contact who shall be responsible for the child’s care coordination.

(b) Work with the state or county CCS program, as appropriate, to ensure that, at a minimum, and in addition to other statutory and contractual requirements, care coordination and care management activities do all of the following:

(1) Reflect a CCS child or youth family-centered, outcome-based approach to care planning.

(2) Ensure families have access to ongoing information, education, and support so that they understand the care plan for their child or youth and their role in the individual care process, the benefits of mental health services, what self-determination means, and what services might be available.

(3) Adhere to the CCS child’s or youth’s or the CCS child’s or youth’s family’s determination about the appropriate involvement of
 their medical providers and caregivers, according to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191).

(4) Include individual care plans for CCS-eligible children and youth based on the results of the risk assessment process with a particular focus on CCS specialty care.

(5) Consider behavioral health needs of CCS-eligible children and youth and coordinate those services as part of the CCS child’s or youth’s individual care plan, when appropriate, and facilitate a CCS child’s or youth’s ability to access appropriate community resources and other agencies, including referrals, as necessary and appropriate, for behavioral services, such as specialty mental health services and substance use disorder services.

(6) Ensure that children
 and youth and their families have appropriate access to transportation and other support services necessary to receive treatment.

(c) Incorporate all of the following into the CCS child’s or youth’s plan of care:

(1) Access for families so that families know where to go for ongoing information, education, and support in order that they understand the goals, treatment plan, and course of care for their child or youth and their role in the process, what it means to have primary or specialty care for their child or youth, when it is time to call a specialist, primary, urgent care, or emergency room, what an interdisciplinary team is, and what the community resources are.

(2) A primary or specialty care physician who is the primary clinician for the CCS-eligible child or youth and who provides core clinical management
 functions.

(3) Care management and care coordination for the CCS-eligible child or youth across the health care system, including transitions among levels of care and interdisciplinary care teams.

(4) Provision of information about qualified professionals, community resources, or other agencies for services or items outside the scope of responsibility of the managed care plan.

(d) Use clinical data to identify CCS-eligible children or youth at the care site with chronic illness or other significant health issues.

(e) Arrange for timely preventive, acute, and chronic illness treatment of CCS-eligible children or youth in the appropriate setting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 130.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.12.

A Medi-Cal managed care plan serving children and youth with CCS-eligible conditions under the CCS program shall do all of the following:

(a) Coordinate with each regional center operating within the plan’s service area to assist CCS-eligible children and youth with developmental disabilities and their families in understanding and accessing services and act as a central point of contact for questions related to health care access and care concerns, and problem resolution.

(b) Coordinate with the local CCS Medical Therapy Unit (MTU) to ensure appropriate access to MTU services. The Medi-Cal managed care plan shall enter into a memorandum of understanding or similar agreement with the county regarding coordination of
 MTU services and other non-MTU services provided by the plan.

(c) Ensure that families have access to ongoing information, education, and support so they understand the care plan, course of treatment, and expected outcomes for their child or youth, the assessment process, what it means, their role in the process, and what services their child or youth may be eligible for.

(d) Facilitate communication among a CCS child’s or youth’s health care and personal care providers, including in-home supportive services and behavioral health providers, when appropriate, with the CCS-eligible child or youth, parent, or guardian.

(e) Facilitate timely access to primary care, specialty care, pharmacy, and other health services provided by CCS providers and facilities with clinical expertise in treating the enrollee’s specific CCS
 condition that are needed by the CCS child or youth, including referrals to address any physical or cognitive disabilities.

(f) Provide information for families about managed care processes and how to navigate a health plan, including their rights to appeal any service denials, and how to request continuity of care for pharmacy, specialized durable medical equipment, and health care providers pursuant to Section 14094.13.

(g) Establish a mechanism to provide information on how to access local family resource centers or family empowerment centers.

(h) Provide that communication to, and services for, the CCS-eligible children or youth and their families are available in alternative formats that are culturally, linguistically, and physically appropriate through means, including, but not limited to, assistive listening
 systems, sign language interpreters, captioning, written communication, plain language, and written translations in the applicable Medi-Cal threshold languages.

(i) Provide that materials are available and provided to inform CCS children and youth and their families of procedures for obtaining CCS specialty services and Medi-Cal primary care and mental health benefits, including grievance and appeals procedures that are offered by the managed care plan or are available through the Medi-Cal program.

(j) Identify and track children and youth with CCS-eligible conditions for the duration of the child’s or youth’s participation in the Whole Child Model program and for children and youth who age into adult Medi-Cal systems and who continue to be enrolled in the same Medi-Cal managed care plan for at least three years into adulthood, to the extent feasible.

(k) (1) Comply with Medi-Cal due process requirements and provide timely processes for accepting and acting upon complaints and grievances, including procedures for appealing decisions regarding coverage or benefits. The grievance process shall comply with Section 14450 of this code, and Sections 1368 and 1368.01 of the Health and Safety Code and applicable federal law and regulations.

(2) Upon denial, denial of reauthorization, or termination of services, a notice of action shall be sent to the CCS-eligible child or youth, or person legally authorized to act on behalf of the child or youth. The notice of action shall include information about the option to file a Medi-Cal appeal and Medi-Cal due process rights.

(l) Comply with Section 1383.15 of the Health and Safety Code by allowing a child or
 youth or the parent or guardian of a child or youth to receive a second opinion from an appropriately qualified health care professional.

(m) Support the established referral pathways in the non-Whole Child Model counties, including, but not limited to, identifying children who may be eligible for the CCS program through internal reports, provider directed referrals, or direct referrals from the Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 131.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.13.

(a) Each Medi-Cal managed care plan shall establish and maintain a process by which a CCS-eligible child or youth may maintain access to CCS providers that the child or youth has an existing relationship with for treatment of the child’s or youth’s CCS condition for up to 12 months, under the following conditions:

(1) The CCS-eligible child or youth has seen the out-of-network CCS provider for a nonemergency visit at least once during the 12 months immediately preceding the date the Medi-Cal managed care plan assumed responsibility for the child’s or youth’s CCS care under the Whole Child Model program.

(2) The CCS provider accepts the
 health plan’s rate for the service offered or the applicable Medi-Cal or CCS fee-for-service rate, whichever is higher, unless the CCS provider enters into an agreement on an alternative payment methodology mutually agreed to by the CCS provider and the Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(3) The managed care plan confirms that the provider meets applicable CCS standards and has no disqualifying quality of care issues.

(4) The CCS provider provides treatment information to the Medi-Cal managed care plan, to the extent authorized by the state and federal patient privacy provisions.

(b) Each Medi-Cal managed care plan shall establish and maintain a process by which a CCS-eligible child or youth may maintain access to specialized or customized durable medical equipment providers for up to 12 months under the conditions in
 paragraph (2):

(1) For the purposes of this subdivision, “specialized or customized durable medical equipment” means durable medical equipment that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Is uniquely constructed from raw materials or substantially modified from the base material solely for the full-time use of the specific beneficiary according to a physician’s description and orders.

(B) Is made to order or adapted to meet the specific needs of the beneficiary.

(C) Is uniquely constructed, adapted, or modified to permanently preclude the use of the equipment by another individual, and is so different from another item used for the same purpose that the two items cannot be grouped together for pricing purposes.

(2) (A) The CCS-eligible child or youth has an ongoing relationship with a durable medical equipment provider who has previously provided specialized or customized equipment, such as power wheelchairs, repairs, and replacement parts; prosthetic limbs; customized orthotic devices; and individualized assistive technology. This does not include generally available or noncustomized durable medical equipment.

(B) The durable medical equipment provider shall accept the health plan’s rate for the service offered or the applicable Medi-Cal or CCS fee-for-service rate, whichever is higher, unless the durable medical equipment provider enters into an agreement on an alternative payment methodology mutually agreed upon by the durable medical equipment provider and the Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(C) The
 durable medical equipment provider provides information to the Medi-Cal managed care plan as requested by the plan, to the extent authorized by state and federal patient privacy provisions.

(3) The department may extend the continuity of care duration period described in this subdivision for specialized or customized durable medical equipment that is under warranty as specified by the department.

(c) A managed care plan, at its discretion, may extend the continuity of care period beyond the length of time specified in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) (1) Each Medi-Cal managed care plan participating in the Whole Child Model program shall comply with continuity of care requirements in Section 1373.96 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 14185 of this code.

(2) Each Medi-Cal managed care plan shall permit a CCS-eligible child or youth transitioned into the Whole Child Model program to continue use of any currently prescribed prescription drug that is part of a prescribed therapy for the enrollee’s CCS-eligible condition or conditions immediately prior to the date of enrollment, whether or not the prescription drug is covered by the plan, until the Medi-Cal managed care plan and the child’s or youth’s prescribing CCS provider has completed an assessment of the child or youth, created a treatment plan, and agrees with the Medi-Cal managed care plan that the particular prescription drug is no longer medically necessary, or the prescription drug is no longer prescribed by the enrollee’s CCS provider.

(e) Each Medi-Cal managed care plan participating in the Whole Child Model program shall ensure that children and youth are provided expert
 case management, care coordination, service authorization, and provider referral services. Each plan shall meet this requirement by, at the request of the child, youth, or his or her parent or guardian, allowing the child or youth to continue to receive case management and care coordination from his or her public health nurse. This election shall be made within 90 days of the transition of CCS services into the Medi-Cal managed care plan. A plan shall meet this requirement by either or both of the following:

(1) By entering into a memorandum of understanding with the county for case management and care coordination services to the child.

(2) By entering into a memorandum of understanding with the county for case management, care coordination, provider referral, and service authorization to all or some Whole Child Model program participants.

(f) At least 60 days before the transition of CCS services to the Medi-Cal managed care plan, a written notice shall be provided to all CCS children and youth whose CCS care will become the responsibility of the plan explaining their right to continue receiving case management and care coordination services pursuant to subdivision (e), including a written explanation of the process for that election. A reminder notification shall be sent 30 days prior to the start of the transition.

(g) In the event the county public health nurse leaves the CCS program or is no longer available to provide the services requested under this section, the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall transition the care coordination and case management of a child or youth to an employee or contractor of the plan who has received adequate training on the CCS program and who has clinical experience with the CCS
 population or pediatric patients with complex medical conditions.

(h) The department may waive the requirement of subdivision (e) if the Medi-Cal managed care plan demonstrates that it cannot meet the requirement because it would result in substantially increased program costs compared to the existing CCS program allocation as provided by the department through the annual Budget Act. The department shall confirm the information provided by the Medi-Cal managed care plan and meet with the county, affected labor organizations, and the plan in an attempt to reach a mutually agreeable contracting arrangement that fulfills the requirements of this section while also ensuring that the arrangement is not in excess of the current county program allocation.

(i) (1) A family or caregiver of a child or youth may appeal the continuity of care limitation in subdivision
 (a) to the director or his or her designee. When determining whether or not to grant the appeal, the director or his or her designee shall consider all of the following:

(A) Whether the noncontracting CCS provider has any relevant clinical experience or unique expertise that available contracting CCS providers do not have.

(B) If the noncontracting CCS provider is a special care center, whether or not any of the available contracting CCS providers is a special care center of the same type.

(C) The length of the ongoing relationship between the CCS provider and the child or youth.

(D) The proximity of the noncontracting CCS provider to the child’s or youth’s home as compared to the proximity of the contracting CCS provider being put forth by the
 plan.

(2) The opinion of the director or his or her designee shall be final and binding upon the plan.

(j) This section shall not preclude the right of the CCS child or youth to appeal or be eligible for a fair hearing regarding the extension of a continuity of care period.

(k) Each Medi-Cal managed care plan participating in the Whole Child Model program shall notify the CCS child or youth, in writing, 60 days prior to the end of his or her authorized continuity of care period. The notice shall explain the right to petition the plan for an extension of the continuity of care period, the criteria the plan will use to evaluate the petition, and the appeals process if the plan denies the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 625, Sec. 7.   (SB 586)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.14.

(a) Each Medi-Cal managed care plan participating in the Whole Child Model program shall provide a mechanism for a CCS-eligible child’s and youth’s parent or caregiver to request a specialist or clinic as a primary care provider.

(b) A CCS specialist or clinic may serve as a primary care provider if the specialist or clinic agrees to serve in a primary care provider role and is qualified to treat the required range of CCS-eligible conditions of the CCS child or youth.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 625, Sec. 7.   (SB 586)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.15.

A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) Use all current and applicable CCS program guidelines, including CCS program regulations, CCS numbered letters, and CCS program information notices in developing criteria for use by the plan’s chief medical officer or the equivalent and other care management staff.

(b) In cases in which applicable CCS clinical guidelines do not exist, use evidence-based guidelines or treatment protocols that are medically appropriate given the child’s CCS-eligible condition.

(c) Utilize only CCS providers to treat CCS conditions in
 any circumstance in which the child’s CCS-eligible condition requires treatment from the provider types in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14094.4, except a plan may use an out-of-state provider if an in-state CCS provider does not possess the clinical expertise to appropriately treat the CCS condition of the child or youth.

(d) Utilize a provider dispute resolution process that meets the standards established under Section 1371.38 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 625, Sec. 7.   (SB 586)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.16.

(a) The department shall pay any managed care plan participating in the Whole Child Model program a separate, actuarially sound rate specifically for CCS children and youth, to the extent that an actuarially sound rate can be developed for the managed care plan’s CCS population. When contracting with managed care plans, the department may allow the use of risk corridors or other methods to appropriately mitigate a plan’s risk for this population. If services are already established in the rate of a Medi-Cal managed care plan prior to January 1, 2016, the department shall not be required to create a separate rate for the Whole Child Model program.

(b) Medi-Cal managed care plans shall pay physician
 and surgeon provider services at rates that are equal to or exceed the applicable CCS fee-for-service rates, unless the physician and surgeon enters into an agreement on an alternative payment methodology mutually agreed to by the physician and surgeon and the Medi-Cal managed care plan

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 625, Sec. 7.   (SB 586)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.17.

(a) A Medi-Cal managed care plan participating in the Whole Child Model program shall create and maintain a clinical advisory committee, composed of the managed care contractor’s chief medical officer or the equivalent, the county CCS medical director, and at least four CCS-paneled providers, to advise on clinical issues relating to CCS conditions, including treatment authorization guidelines, and serve as clinical advisers on other clinical issues relating to CCS conditions.

(b) (1) A Medi-Cal managed care plan participating in the Whole Child Model program shall establish a family advisory group for CCS families.

(2) Family representatives who serve on this advisory group
 may receive a reasonable per diem payment to enable in-person participation in the advisory group. A plan may conduct family advisory group meetings by teleconference or through other similar electronic means to facilitate family participation in this advisory group.

(3) A representative of this local group shall be invited to serve on the department’s statewide stakeholder advisory group established pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) (1) The department shall establish a statewide Whole Child Model program stakeholder advisory group, or modify an existing Whole Child Model program stakeholder advisory group, composed of representatives of CCS providers, county CCS program administrators, health plans, family resource centers, regional centers, recognized exclusive representatives of CCS county providers, CCS case managers, CCS medical therapy units, and
 representatives from family advisory groups established pursuant to subdivision (b). Participation on the statewide stakeholder advisory group shall be voluntary, and members shall be ineligible for travel or other per diem payments.

(2) The department shall consult with the stakeholder advisory group on the implementation of the Whole Child Model program and shall consider the recommendations of the stakeholder advisory group in developing the monitoring processes and outcome measures by which the plans participating in the Whole Child Model program shall be monitored and evaluated.

(3) The statewide Whole Child Model program stakeholder advisory group, as established under this section, shall terminate on December 31,
 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 132.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.18.

(a) (1) The department shall contract with an independent entity that has experience in performing robust program evaluations to conduct an evaluation to assess Medi-Cal managed care plan performance and the outcomes and the experience of CCS-eligible children and youth participating in the Whole Child Model program, including access to primary and specialty care, and youth transitions from Whole Child Model program to adult Medi-Cal coverage.

(2) The department shall provide a report on the results of this evaluation required pursuant to this section to the Legislature by
 January 1, 2021, or three years from the date when all counties described in Section 14094.5 are fully operational under the Whole Child Model program pursuant to this article, whichever is later. A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) The evaluation required by this section, at a minimum, shall evaluate the performance of the plans participating in the Whole Child Model program as compared to the performance of the CCS program prior to the implementation of the Whole Child Model program in those same counties. The evaluation shall evaluate whether the inclusion of CCS services in a managed care delivery system improves access to care, quality of care, and the patient experience by analyzing all of the following, and
 when possible, disaggregating the results, based on the child’s or youth’s race,
 ethnicity, and primary language spoken at home:

(1) Access to specialty and primary care, and in particular, utilization of CCS-paneled providers.

(2) The type and location of CCS services and the extent to which CCS services are provided in-network compared to out of network.

(3) Utilization rates of inpatient admissions, outpatient services, durable medical equipment, behavioral health services, home health, pharmacy, and other ancillary services.

(4) Patient and family satisfaction.

(5) Appeals and grievances, including the number of petitions to the plan to extend the continuity of
 care period for durable medical equipment and CCS providers, the results of those appeals, whether any subsequent appeals were made to the department, and the results of those appeals to the department.

(6) Authorization of CCS-eligible services.

(7) Network and provider participation, including participation of pediatricians, pediatric specialists, and pediatric subspecialists, by specialty and subspecialty.

(8) The ability of a child or youth who ages out of CCS and remains in the same Medi-Cal managed care plan to retain his or her existing providers, to the extent possible or known.

(c) The evaluation required by this section shall also evaluate managed
 care plans participating in the Whole Child Model program as compared to the CCS program in counties where CCS services are not incorporated into managed care, and collect appropriate data to evaluate all of the following:

(1) The rate of new CCS enrollment in each county.

(2) The percentage of CCS-eligible children and youth with a diagnosis requiring a referral to a CCS special care center who have been seen by a CCS special care center.

(3) The percentage of CCS children and youth discharged from a hospital who had at least one followup contact or visit within 28 days after discharge.

(4) Appeals and grievances.

(d) The department shall consult with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the Whole Child Model program stakeholder advisory group, regarding the scope and structure of the review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 23.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.19.

This article is not intended, and shall not be interpreted, to permit any reduction in benefits or eligibility levels under the CCS program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 625, Sec. 7.   (SB 586)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.20.

(a) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this article, Article 2.97 (commencing with Section 14093), Article 2.98 (commencing with Section 14094), and any applicable federal waivers and state plan amendments by means of all-county letters, plan letters, CCS numbered letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. By January 1, 2023,
 the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Commencing July 1, 2018, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(b) The director may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid, nonbid, or negotiated basis and may amend existing managed care contracts to provide or arrange for services provided under this article. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section
 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and shall be exempt from the review and approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 181, Sec. 2.   (AB 1585)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.99. Provider Contract Considerations [14095. - 14095.]

14095.

(a) For any entity or program that seeks to contract with the department to provide, or arrange for the provision of, managed health care services, disease management, or other health services contracted for on a basis other than fee-for-service, the department may consider, but shall not be limited to considering, all of the following:

(1) Whether the applicant is of reputable and responsible character. The department may consider any available information that the applicant
 has demonstrated a pattern and practice of violations of state or federal laws and regulations.

(2) Whether the applicant has the ability to provide, or arrange for the provision of, health care benefits or services. The department may consider evidence that may include all of the following:

(A) Any prior history of providing, or arranging for the provision of, health care services or benefits in this state, the applicant’s history of substantial compliance with the requirements imposed under that license, and applicable federal laws, regulations, and requirements.

(B) Any prior history in this state or any other state, of providing, or arranging for the provision of, health care services or benefits authorized to receive Medicare Program reimbursement or Medicaid Program reimbursement, the applicant’s history of
 substantial compliance with that state’s requirements, and applicable federal laws, regulations, and requirements.

(C) Any prior history of providing, or arranging for the provision of, health services as a licensed health professional or an individual or entity contracting with a health care service plan or insurer, and the applicant’s history of substantial compliance with state requirements, and applicable federal law, regulations, and requirements.

(b) The department may also require the entity described in subdivision (a) to furnish other information or documents for the proper administration and enforcement of the licensing laws.

(c) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), “applicant” shall include the applicant’s management company, any affiliate of the applicant, and any controlling person, officer,
 director, or other person occupying a principal management or supervisory position for the applicant, its management company, or an affiliate of the applicant.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict or limit the department in any way from considering any other factor required by law, or determined by the department to be necessary for consideration, prior to entering into a contract for the provision of managed health care services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 758, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration [14100. - 14124.16.]

14100.

The administration of this chapter shall be carried out by the same agents as are authorized by the several boards of supervisors to administer the public assistance programs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14100.1.

For purposes of administering this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of this part, the director shall have those powers and duties necessary to conform to requirements for securing approval of a state plan under the provisions of the applicable federal law, and the department shall be the single state agency for purposes of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

14100.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (i), all types of information, whether written or oral, concerning a person, made or kept by any public officer or agency in connection with the administration of any provision of this chapter, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), or Chapter 8.7 (commencing with Section 14520) and for which a grant-in-aid is received by this state from the United States government pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act shall be confidential, and shall not be open to examination other than for purposes
 directly connected with the administration of the Medi-Cal program. However, in the context of a petition for the appointment of a conservator for a person with respect to whom this information is made or kept, and in the context of a criminal prosecution for a violation of Section 368 of Penal Code with respect to such a person, all of the following shall apply:

A public officer or employee of any such agency may answer truthfully, at any proceeding related to the petition or prosecution, when asked if he or she is aware of information that he or she believes is related to the legal mental capacity of that aid recipient or the need for a conservatorship for that aid recipient. If the officer or employee states that he or she is aware of this information, the court may order the officer or employee to testify about his or her observations and to disclose any relevant agency records if the court has an other independent reason to believe that the officer or employee
 has information that would facilitate the resolution of the matter.

(b) Except as provided in this section, and to the extent permitted by federal law or regulation, all information about applicants and recipients as provided for in subdivision (a) to be safeguarded includes, but is not limited to, names and addresses, medical services provided, social and economic conditions or circumstances, agency evaluation of personal information, and medical data, including diagnosis and past history of disease or disability.

(c) Purposes directly connected with the administration of the Medi-Cal program, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), or Chapter 8.7 (commencing with Section 14520) encompass those administrative activities and responsibilities in which the department and its agents are required to engage to insure effective program operations. These activities include, but are